Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-520
Service by publication; when complete; how proved; affidavit of publication.

Service by publication shall be deemed complete when it shall have been made in the manner and for the time prescribed in section 25-519; and such service shall be proved by the affidavit of the printer or his foreman or principal clerk, or other person knowing the same.

R.S.1867, Code § 80, p. 406;

R.S.1913, § 7643;

C.S.1922, § 8586;

C.S.1929, § 20-520;

R.S.1943, § 25-520.

In tax foreclosure case, section is strictly construed. Armstrong v. Griffith, 94 Neb. 515, 143 N.W. 461 (1913).

Service is complete upon distribution of paper containing its fourth successive weekly insertion. Claypool v. Robb, 90 Neb. 193, 133 N.W. 178 (1911).

Any one having actual knowledge of facts may make affidavit. Taylor v. Coots, 32 Neb. 30, 48 N.W. 964 (1891).

Court may permit amendment of affidavit to conform to facts. Britton v. Larson, 23 Neb. 806, 37 N.W. 681 (1888).